Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Chapter 12. Statewide Communications Interoperability.

§ 9.1-1200.
Repealed by Acts 2011, cc, 780 and 858, cl. 2, effective April 6, 2011.

Editor’s note.

Former Chapter 12 (§

9.1-1200

) of Title 9.1, pertaining to the annual review and update of the statewide communications interoperability strategic plan, was enacted as Chapter 11
(§

9.1-1100

) of Title 9.1 by Acts 2005, c. 221, and subsequently renumbered at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.